South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S830.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Insurers and agents prohibited from refusing to issue automobile insurance policies due to certain factors SECTION 1.    Section 38-77-122(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A)(1) No insurer or agent shall refuse to issue an automobile insurance policy as defined in Section 38-77-30 because of any one or more of the following factors: the age, sex, location of residence in this State, race, color, creed, national origin, ancestry, marital status, or income level. No insurer or agent shall refuse to issue an automobile insurance policy as defined in Section 38-77-30 solely because of any one of the following factors: the previous refusal of automobile insurance by another insurer, prior purchase of insurance through the Associated Auto Insurers Plan, or lawful occupation, including the military service, of the person seeking the coverage. Nothing in this section prohibits any insurer from limiting the issuance of motor vehicle insurance policies only to persons engaging in or who have engaged in a particular profession or occupation, or who are members of a particular religious sect, or members of a nonprofit member organization. (2) Nothing in this section prohibits any insurer from setting rates in accordance with relevant actuarial data. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 18th day of May, 2026. __________